District of Columbia statutes.
9-421.07

Exemption for resurfacing by heater method.

No assessment shall be levied for the cost of resurfacing asphalt pavements by the heater method — stripping the surface from a rigid type base, and replacing surface thereon — or covering an existing hard surface or macadam pavement or base with bituminous material; provided, that where an entire pavement is removed and replaced with a pavement of the character specified in § 9-421.01, the cost of the latter pavement shall be assessed as provided in this subchapter, if no previous legal assessment has been levied and paid therefor.

Feb. 20, 1931, 46 Stat. 1198, ch. 246, § 7
This section is referenced in § 9-421.13.
1981 Ed., § 7-633.
1973 Ed., § 7-628.